North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-04 Federal Aid

24-04-01.
Assent to federal aid given.

The legislative assent required by section 1 of the Act of Congress approved July 11, 1916, Public Law No. 156, entitled “An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in the construction of rural post roads, and for other purposes,” is hereby given. The director is authorized and empowered to make all contracts and to do all things necessary to cooperate with the United States government in the construction of roads under the provisions of the said Act or other Act of Congress that hereafter may be enacted, including the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1950 regarding secondary roads.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0401.

Note.

Provisions of the various Federal Aid Highway Acts appear in 23 USCS. Provisions on highway relocation assistance, succeeding those formerly compiled in that title, now appear at 42 USCS § 4601 et seq.

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of state legislation to reimburse public utilities for cost of relocating their facilities because of highway construction, conditioned upon federal reimbursement of the state under the terms of Federal Aid Highway Act (23 USCS § 123). 75 A.L.R.2d 419.

Park and recreation lands: construction and application of § 4(f) of Department of Transportation Act of 1966 (49 USCS § 1653 (f), as amended, and § 18 (a) of Federal Aid Highway Act of 1968 (23 USCS § 138) requiring secretary of transportation to determine that all possible planning for highways has been done to minimize harm to public park and recreation lands. 19 A.L.R. Fed. 904.

24-04-02.
Federal-aid highways included in highway systems of state.

In the selection and designation of highway systems, as provided for under this title, due consideration must be given to those highways on which federal-aid funds have been expended, and when practicable and justifiable, such federal-aid highways must be included in said systems.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 23; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0402.

24-04-03.
Feeder roads and rural transportation assistance programs — Director may cooperate with federal government.

The director may receive and expend any funds within the limits of legislative appropriations made available by the Congress of the United States to be applied on the county road system, and other roads or streets not on the state highway system and to assist in the development and improvement of surface transportation systems in rural and small urban areas, including projects and programs for the construction of public roads not on any federal-aid system, correction of safety hazards and replacement of bridges, development of parking facilities to serve buses and other means of public transportation of passengers, and for the purchase of buses used in public transportation service. The director may carry out the intent and purpose of rural transportation assistance programs authorized by Congress to the same extent that the director now may cooperate legally with federal-aid highway construction and maintenance programs, except as hereinafter provided. The director may not engage in or provide state funds for the operation of any public bus transportation system except by contract with a local governmental entity or a private operator and may expend no revenue derived from gas tax or motor vehicle licensing in the establishment or operation of such public bus transportation system.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 24; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0403; S.L. 1975, ch. 240, § 1.

24-04-04.
Municipalities may aid federal highway construction.

A municipality, through its governing body, wherever a federal-aid highway is routed through such municipality, may participate in the financing, planning, construction, and acquisition of right of way of said highway.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 26; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0404; S.L. 1959, ch. 228, § 3.

Cross-References.

Municipality may enter into agreement with highway department or county for certain improvements, see § 40-22-06.

24-04-05.
Municipalities may pay share of highway cost by taxes or special assessments.

Any municipality may raise funds for the purpose of meeting its share of the cost of construction, financing, planning, or acquiring a right of way of a federal-aid highway through general taxes to be levied at large throughout such municipality, or where such highway in the opinion of the governing body of said municipality particularly and materially benefits property abutting thereon, may provide said sum through special assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 27; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0405.

24-04-06.
General laws govern taxes and special assessments to pay highway costs.

All provisions of law relating to the levying of taxes for internal improvements of municipalities and the levying of special assessments for such improvements are applicable to sections 24-04-04 and 24-04-05 insofar as they are not inconsistent with the general purpose thereof, namely, to permit such municipalities to participate in federal-aid highway construction, financing, planning, and acquisition of right of way, through and within their limits.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 28; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0406.